Nebraska, session 109, LB490.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 60-101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-101 Sections 60-101 to 60-197 and section 6 of this act shall be known
and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act.
Sec. 2. Section 60-137, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-137 (1) The Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act applies to all
vehicles as defined in the act, except:
(a) Farm trailers;
(b) Well-boring apparatus, backhoes, bulldozers, and front-end loaders;
and
(c) Trucks and buses from other jurisdictions required to pay registration
fees under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, except a vehicle registered or
eligible to be registered as part of a fleet of apportionable vehicles under
section 60-3,198.
(2)(a) All new all-terrain vehicles and minibikes sold on or after January
1, 2004, shall be required to have a certificate of title. An owner of an all-
terrain vehicle or minibike sold prior to such date may apply for a certificate
of title for such all-terrain vehicle or minibike as provided in rules and
regulations of the department.
(b) All new low-speed vehicles sold on or after January 1, 2012, shall be
required to have a certificate of title. An owner of a low-speed vehicle sold
prior to such date may apply for a certificate of title for such low-speed
vehicle as provided in rules and regulations of the department.
(3) An owner of any of the following a utility trailer may apply for a
certificate of title upon compliance with the Motor Vehicle Certificate of
Title Act: .
(a) Any utility trailer;
(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, any self-propelled equipment designed and
used exclusively to carry and apply fertilizer, chemicals, or related products
to agricultural soil and crops, agricultural floater-spreader implements, and
other implements of husbandry designed for and used primarily for tilling the
soil and harvesting crops or feeding livestock; or
(c) Beginning January 1, 2026, any power unit hay grinders or a
combination that includes a power unit and a hay grinder when operated without
cargo.
(4)(a) Every owner of a manufactured home or mobile home shall obtain a
certificate of title for the manufactured home or mobile home prior to affixing
it to real estate.
(b) If a manufactured home or mobile home has been affixed to real estate
and a certificate of title was not issued before it was so affixed, the owner
of such manufactured home or mobile home shall apply for and be issued a
certificate of title at any time for surrender and cancellation as provided in
section 60-169.
(5) All new utility-type vehicles sold on or after January 1, 2011, shall
be required to have a certificate of title. An owner of a utility-type vehicle
sold prior to such date may apply for a certificate of title for such utility-
type vehicle as provided in rules and regulations of the department.
Sec. 3. Section 60-152, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-152 (1) The county treasurer shall issue a certificate of title for a
vehicle in duplicate and retain one copy in his or her office. An electronic
copy, in a form prescribed by the department, shall be transmitted on the day
of issuance to the department. The county treasurer shall sign and affix the
appropriate seal to the original certificate of title and, if there are no
liens on the vehicle, deliver the certificate to the applicant. If there are
one or more liens on the vehicle, the certificate of title shall be handled as
provided in section 60-164 or 60-165 or section 6 of this act.
(2) The county treasurers of the various counties shall adopt a circular
seal with the words County Treasurer of ........... (insert name) County
thereon. Such seal shall be used by the county treasurer or the deputy or legal
authorized agent of such officer, without charge to the applicant, on any
certificate of title, application for certificate of title, duplicate copy,
-1-

LB490 LB490
2025 2025
assignment or reassignment, power of attorney, statement, or affidavit
pertaining to the issuance of a Nebraska certificate of title.
(3) The department shall prescribe a uniform method of numbering
certificates of title.
(4) The county treasurer shall (a) file all certificates of title
according to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department,
(b) maintain in the office indices for such certificates of title, (c) be
authorized to destroy all previous records five years after a subsequent
transfer has been made on a vehicle, and (d) be authorized to destroy all
certificates of title and all supporting records and documents which have been
on file for a period of five years or more from the date of filing the
certificate or a notation of lien, whichever occurs later.
Sec. 4. Section 60-164, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-164 (1) The department shall implement an electronic title and lien
system for vehicles. The holder of a security interest, trust receipt,
conditional sales contract, or similar instrument regarding a vehicle, or
beginning on the implementation date determined by the director pursuant to
subsection (7) of section 60-1507, a licensed dealer, may file a lien
electronically as prescribed by the department. Upon receipt of an application
for a certificate of title for a vehicle, any lien filed electronically shall
become part of the electronic certificate of title record created by the county
treasurer or department maintained on the electronic title and lien system. If
an application for a certificate of title indicates that there is a lien or
encumbrance on a vehicle or if a lien or notice of lien has been filed
electronically, the department shall retain an electronic certificate of title
record and shall note and cancel such liens electronically on the system. The
department shall provide access to the electronic certificate of title records
for licensed dealers and lienholders who participate in the system by a method
determined by the director.
(2) Except as provided in section 60-165 or section 6 of this act, the
provisions of article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, shall never be construed to
apply to or to permit or require the deposit, filing, or other record
whatsoever of a security agreement, conveyance intended to operate as a
mortgage, trust receipt, conditional sales contract, or similar instrument or
any copy of the same covering a vehicle. Any mortgage, conveyance intended to
operate as a security agreement as provided by article 9, Uniform Commercial
Code, trust receipt, conditional sales contract, or other similar instrument
covering a vehicle, if such instrument is accompanied by delivery of such
manufacturer's or importer's certificate and followed by actual and continued
possession of the same by the holder of such instrument or, in the case of a
certificate of title, if a notation of the same has been made electronically as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section or by the county treasurer or
department on the face of the certificate of title or on the electronic
certificate of title record, shall be valid as against the creditors of the
debtor, whether armed with process or not, and subsequent purchasers, secured
parties, and other lienholders or claimants but otherwise shall not be valid
against them, except that during any period in which a vehicle is inventory, as
defined in section 9-102, Uniform Commercial Code, held for sale by a person or
corporation that is required to be licensed as provided in the Motor Vehicle
Industry Regulation Act and is in the business of selling such vehicles, the
filing provisions of article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, as applied to
inventory, shall apply to a security interest in such vehicle created by such
person or corporation as debtor without the notation of lien on the certificate
of title. A buyer of a vehicle at retail from a dealer required to be licensed
as provided in the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act shall take such
vehicle free of any security interest. A purchase-money security interest, as
defined in section 9-103, Uniform Commercial Code, in a vehicle is perfected
against the rights of judicial lien creditors and execution creditors on and
after the date the purchase-money security interest attaches.
(3) Subject to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, all liens,
security agreements, and encumbrances noted upon a certificate of title or an
electronic certificate of title record and all liens noted electronically as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section shall take priority according to
the order of time in which the same are noted by the county treasurer or
department. Exposure for sale of any vehicle by the owner thereof with the
knowledge or with the knowledge and consent of the holder of any lien, security
agreement, or encumbrance on such vehicle shall not render the same void or
ineffective as against the creditors of such owner or holder of subsequent
liens, security agreements, or encumbrances upon such vehicle.
(4) The holder of a security agreement, trust receipt, conditional sales
contract, or similar instrument, upon presentation of such instrument to the
department or to any county treasurer, together with the certificate of title
and the fee prescribed for notation of lien, may have a notation of such lien
made on the face of such certificate of title. The owner of a vehicle may
present a valid out-of-state certificate of title issued to such owner for such
vehicle with a notation of lien on such certificate of title and the prescribed
fee to the county treasurer or department and have the notation of lien made on
the new certificate of title issued pursuant to section 60-144 without
presenting a copy of the lien instrument. The county treasurer or the
department shall enter the notation and the date thereof over the signature of
the person making the notation and the seal of the office. If noted by a county
treasurer, he or she shall on that day notify the department which shall note
-2-

LB490 LB490
2025 2025
the lien on its records. The county treasurer or the department shall also
indicate by appropriate notation and on such instrument itself the fact that
such lien has been noted on the certificate of title.
(5) A transaction does not create a sale or a security interest in a
vehicle, other than an all-terrain vehicle, a utility-type vehicle, or a
minibike, merely because it provides that the rental price is permitted or
required to be adjusted under the agreement either upward or downward by
reference to the amount realized upon sale or other disposition of the vehicle.
(6) The county treasurer or the department, upon receipt of a lien
instrument duly signed by the owner in the manner prescribed by law governing
such lien instruments together with the fee prescribed for notation of lien,
shall notify the first lienholder to deliver to the county treasurer or the
department, within fifteen days after the date of notice, the certificate of
title to permit notation of such other lien and, after notation of such other
lien, the county treasurer or the department shall deliver the certificate of
title to the first lienholder. The holder of a certificate of title who refuses
to deliver a certificate of title to the county treasurer or the department for
the purpose of showing such other lien on such certificate of title within
fifteen days after the date of notice shall be liable for damages to such other
lienholder for the amount of damages such other lienholder suffered by reason
of the holder of the certificate of title refusing to permit the showing of
such lien on the certificate of title.
(7) Upon receipt of a subsequent lien instrument duly signed by the owner
in the manner prescribed by law governing such lien instruments or a notice of
lien filed electronically, together with an application for notation of the
subsequent lien, the fee prescribed in section 60-154, and, if a printed
certificate of title exists, the presentation of the certificate of title, the
county treasurer or department shall make notation of such other lien. If the
certificate of title is not an electronic certificate of title record, the
county treasurer or department, upon receipt of a lien instrument duly signed
by the owner in the manner prescribed by law governing such lien instruments
together with the fee prescribed for notation of lien, shall notify the first
lienholder to deliver to the county treasurer or department, within fifteen
days after the date of notice, the certificate of title to permit notation of
such other lien. After such notation of lien, the lien shall become part of the
electronic certificate of title record created by the county treasurer or
department which is maintained on the electronic title and lien system. The
holder of a certificate of title who refuses to deliver a certificate of title
to the county treasurer or department for the purpose of noting such other lien
on such certificate of title within fifteen days after the date when notified
to do so shall be liable for damages to such other lienholder for the amount of
damages such other lienholder suffered by reason of the holder of the
certificate of title refusing to permit the noting of such lien on the
certificate of title.
(8) When a lien is discharged, the holder shall, within fifteen days after
payment is received, note a cancellation of the lien on the certificate of
title over his, her, or its signature and deliver the certificate of title to
the county treasurer or the department, which shall note the cancellation of
the lien on the face of the certificate of title and on the records of such
office. If delivered to a county treasurer, he or she shall on that day notify
the department which shall note the cancellation on its records. The county
treasurer or the department shall then return the certificate of title to the
owner or as otherwise directed by the owner. The cancellation of lien shall be
noted on the certificate of title without charge. For an electronic certificate
of title record, the lienholder shall, within fifteen days after payment is
received when such lien is discharged, notify the department electronically or
provide written notice of such lien release, in a manner prescribed by the
department, to the county treasurer or department. The department shall note
the cancellation of lien and, if no other liens exist, issue the certificate of
title to the owner or as otherwise directed by the owner or lienholder. If the
holder of the title cannot locate a lienholder, a lien may be discharged ten
years after the date of filing by presenting proof that thirty days have passed
since the mailing of a written notice by certified mail, return receipt
requested, to the last-known address of the lienholder.
Sec. 5. Section 60-166, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-166 (1)(a) This subsection applies prior to the implementation date
designated by the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subsection (2) of
section 60-1508.
(b) In the event of (i) the transfer of ownership of a vehicle by
operation of law as upon inheritance, devise, bequest, order in bankruptcy,
insolvency, replevin, or execution sale or as provided in sections 30-24,125,
52-601.01 to 52-605, 60-1901 to 60-1911, and 60-2401 to 60-2411, (ii) the
engine of a vehicle being replaced by another engine, (iii) a vehicle being
sold to satisfy storage or repair charges or under section 76-1607, or (iv)
repossession being had upon default in performance of the terms of a chattel
mortgage, trust receipt, conditional sales contract, or other like agreement,
the county treasurer of any county or the department, upon the surrender of the
prior certificate of title or the manufacturer's or importer's certificate, or
when that is not possible, upon presentation of satisfactory proof of ownership
and right of possession to such vehicle, and upon payment of the appropriate
fee and the presentation of an application for certificate of title, may issue
to the applicant a certificate of title thereto.
-3-

LB490 LB490
2025 2025
(2)(a) This subsection applies beginning on the implementation date
designated by the director pursuant to subsection (2) of section 60-1508.
(b) In the event of (i) the transfer of ownership of a vehicle by
operation of law as upon inheritance, devise, bequest, order in bankruptcy,
insolvency, replevin, or execution sale or as provided in section 30-24,125,
sections 52-601.01 to 52-605, sections 60-1901 to 60-1911, and sections 60-2401
to 60-2411, (ii) the engine of a vehicle being replaced by another engine,
(iii) a vehicle being sold to satisfy storage or repair charges or under
section 76-1607, or (iv) repossession being had upon default in performance of
the terms of a chattel mortgage, trust receipt, conditional sales contract, or
other like agreement, and upon acceptance of an electronic certificate of title
record after repossession, in addition to the title requirements in this
section, the county treasurer of any county or the department, upon the
surrender of the prior certificate of title or the manufacturer's or importer's
certificate, or when that is not possible, upon presentation of satisfactory
proof of ownership and right of possession to such vehicle, and upon payment of
the appropriate fee and the presentation of an application for certificate of
title, may issue to the applicant a certificate of title thereto.
(3) If the prior certificate of title issued for such vehicle provided for
joint ownership with right of survivorship, a new certificate of title shall be
issued to a subsequent purchaser upon the assignment of the prior certificate
of title by the surviving owner and presentation of satisfactory proof of death
of the deceased owner.
(4) Only an affidavit by the person or agent of the person to whom
possession of such vehicle has so passed, setting forth facts entitling him or
her to such possession and ownership, together with a copy of a court order or
an instrument upon which such claim of possession and ownership is founded,
shall be considered satisfactory proof of ownership and right of possession,
except that if the applicant cannot produce such proof of ownership, he or she
may submit to the department such evidence as he or she may have, and the
department may thereupon, if it finds the evidence sufficient, issue the
certificate of title or authorize any county treasurer to issue a certificate
of title, as the case may be.
(5) If from the records of the county treasurer or the department there
appear to be any liens on such vehicle, such certificate of title shall comply
with section 60-164 or 60-165 or section 6 of this act regarding such liens
unless the application is accompanied by proper evidence of their satisfaction
or extinction.
Sec. 6. (1) For purposes of this section, device means any of the
following for which a certificate of title has been issued under subsection (3)
of section 60-137:
(a) Any utility trailer;
(b) Any self-propelled equipment designed and used exclusively to carry
and apply fertilizer, chemicals, or related products to agricultural soil and
crops, agricultural floater-spreader implements, and other implements of
husbandry designed for and used primarily for tilling the soil and harvesting
crops or feeding livestock; or
(c) Any power unit hay grinders or a combination that includes a power
unit and a hay grinder when operated without cargo.
(2) Any security interest in a device that is perfected pursuant to
article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, before, on, or after January 1, 2026, shall
continue to be perfected until (a) the financing statement perfecting such
security interest is terminated or lapses in the absence of the filing of a
continuation statement pursuant to article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, or (b) a
certificate of title is issued and a notation of lien is made for the device as
provided in section 60-164.
(3) Any lien noted on the face of a certificate of title for the device or
on an electronic certificate of title record for the device pursuant to
subsection (2), (4), or (5) of this section, on behalf of the holder of a
security interest in the device that was previously perfected pursuant to
article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, shall have priority as of the date such
security interest was originally perfected.
(4) The holder of a certificate of title for a device shall, upon request,
surrender the certificate of title to a holder of a previously perfected
security interest in the device to permit notation of a lien on the certificate
of title or on an electronic certificate of title record and shall do such
other acts as may be required to permit such notation.
(5) If the owner of a device subject to a security interest perfected
pursuant to article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, fails or refuses to obtain a
certificate of title after January 1, 2026, the security interest holder may
obtain a certificate of title in the name of the owner of the device following
the procedures of section 60-144 and may have a lien noted on the certificate
of title or on an electronic certificate of title record pursuant to section
60-164.
(6) The assignment, release, or satisfaction of a security interest in a
device shall be governed by the laws under which it was perfected.
Sec. 7. Original sections 60-101, 60-137, 60-152, 60-164, and 60-166,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-4-